en: Salts from Québec
da: Salte fra Québec
fr: Sels du Québéc
hr: Soli iz Québeca
lt: Druskos iš Kvebeko
nb: Salter fra Québec
nl: Zout uit Québec
nn: Salt frå Québec
sv: Salter från Québec

en: Table salts
da: Bordsalte
de: Speisesalze, Tafelsalze
es: Sales de mesa
fi: Pöytäsuolat
fr: Sels de table
hr: Kuhinjske soli
it: Sale da tavola
ja: 食卓塩
nb: Bordsalter
nl: Keukenzouten
nn: Bordsalt
sv: Bordssalter
tr: Sofra tuzu, Yemek tuzu

en: Low-sodium salts, reduced sodium salts
da: Salte med lavt natriumindhold
fr: Sels réduits en sodium, sels à teneur réduite en sodium
sv: Salter med låg natriumhalt

en: Flavoured salts, Flavored salts
da: Salte med smag
fr: Sels aromatisés
nl: Gearomatiseerde zouten
sv: Salter med smak

en: Celery salts, Celery salt
fr: Sels au céleri, Sel au céleri
hr: Sol celera
lt: Salierų druskos
pl: Sól selerowa

en: Garlic salts
af: Knoffelsout
ar: ملح الثوم
ca: Sal d'all
da: Hvidløgssalte
de: Knoblauchsalze
eo: Ajlsaloj
es: Sals de ajo
fa: نمک سیر
fi: Valkosipulisuola
id: Garam bawang putih
ja: ガーリックソルト
ms: Garam bawang putih
nl: Knoflookzout
pl: Sól czosnkowa
sv: Vitlökssalter
uz: Sarimsoq tuzi
zh: 蒜鹽

en: Herbal salts
da: Urtesalte
de: Kräutersalz
fi: Yrttisuola
nb: Urtesalter
nn: Urtesalt
sv: Örtsalter

en: Herbs and spices
da: Urter og krydderier
sv: Örter och kryddor

en: Frozen Herbs and Spices
da: Frosne urter og krydderier

en: Herbs/Spices/Extracts Variety Packs
de: Kräuter/Gewürze/Extrakte - Mischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de hierbas y especias
fr: Assortiments d'herbes et épices
hr: Pakiranja raznih biljaka/začina/ekstrakata
it: Confezioni miste di erbe e spezie
nl: Assortimenten van kruiden en specerijen
pt: Packs variados de temperos

en: Spices
bg: Подправки
ca: Espècies
cs: Koření
da: Ikke-grønne plantedele krydderier
de: Gewürze
es: Especias
fi: ei-vihreät kasvinosat mausteet
fr: Epices
he: תבלינים
hr: Začinima
hu: Nem zöld növényi rész fűszerek
it: Spezie
ja: 香辛料, スパイス
lt: Prieskoniai
nl: Specerijen
pl: przyprawy z niezielonych części roślin
pt: Temperos
ro: Condimente
ru: Специи
sv: Kryddor
tr: Baharat
zh: 香辛料

en: Allspices, All spices, Allspice, Jamaica pepper, Myrtle pepper
af: Wonderpeper
ar: فلفل إفرنجي
az: İkievli pimenta
be: Ангельскае зелле, Пімента лекавая
bg: Бахар
bn: কাবাব চিনি
ca: Pebrer de Jamaica, Pebre de Jamaica
cs: Nové koření, Pimentovník pravý
da: Allehånde
de: Jamaikapfeffer, Piment, Allgewürz, Viergewürz
el: Μπαχάρι
eo: Dioika pimentoj
es: Pimientas de Jamaica
et: Vürtspipar, Harilik pimendipuu
fa: فلفل فرنگی
fi: Maustepippuri
fr: Piments de la Jamaïque, Piment de la Jamaïque, Piment de Jamaïque
ga: Ilspíosra
hr: Pimen
ht: Malagèt
hu: Szegfűbors
hy: Բուրավետ պղպեղ
id: Merica Jamaika
is: Allrahanda
it: Pepe di Giamaica, Pepe garofanato, Pimenteira
ja: オールスパイス
ko: 올스파이스나무
la: Pimenta dioica
lt: Kvapusis pipiras
ml: സർവ സുഗന്ധി
ms: Rempah tiga rasa
nb: Allehånder
nl: Piment, Jamaicaanse peper
nn: Allehandar
pl: Ziele angielskie, Ziela angielskiego, Pieprz z Jamajki, Korzennik lekarski
pt: Pimenta da jamaica
ro: Ienibahar
ru: Душистый перец, Перец душистый, Перец душистый молотый, Пимента лекарственная
sl: Piment, Pimentovec
sr: Најгвирц
sv: Kryddpeppar
ta: ஆல்ஸ்பைஸ்
th: ออลสไปซ์
to: Sipaisi
tr: Yeni bahar
uk: Духмяний перець, Перець духмяний
ur: سیتل چینی
zh: 多香果

en: Whole allspices, Allspice peppercorns
da: Hele allehånde
sv: Kryddpepparkorn, Hela kryddpeppar

en: Ground allspices
sv: Malen kryddpeppar, Malna kryddpepparkorn

en: Anise, Aniseed, Green anise
de: Anise
es: Anís verde
fr: Anis, Anis vert, Infusions Anis vert
hr: Anis
hu: Ánizs
ja: アニス
la: Pimpinella anisum
lt: Anyžius
nl: Anijs, Anijszaad, Anijszaden
pl: Anyż, Biedrzeniec anyż

en: Amchoor, amchur, aamchur, Mango powder, Dried mango powder
fr: Amchur, amchoor, aamchur, Poudre de mangues, Poudre de mangue
zh: 芒果粉

en: asafoetida, hing
ar: حِلْتِيت‎
de: Teufelsdreck
es: asafétida
fa: انگدان‎, انگژد‎, رافه‎, هنگ‎
fi: hajupihka, pirunpihka
fr: ase fétide
gu: હિંગ
hi: हींग, हीँग, हिंग
hr: Asafetida
hu: bűzös husáng, bűzös aszat
hy: քաղբան, անգուժատ
is: djöflatað
it: assafetida
kk: кеурексасыр
kn: ಇಂಗು
lo: ມະຫາຫິງ
ml: കായം
mr: हिंग
my: ရှိန်းခို
ne: हिङ
nl: asafoetida, duivelsdrek
pl: asafetyda, czarcie łajno, smrodzieniec
ps: انجه‎
pt: assafétida
sa: हिङ्गु
sv: dyvelsträck
ta: பெருங்காயம்
te: ఇంగువ
tg: ров
th: มหาหิงคุ์
tl: inggo, asapetida
tr: şeytantersi, hıthıt

en: Cardamom, cardamon, Elaichi
bg: Кардамон
de: Kardamom
es: Cardamono
fr: Cardamome
hr: Kardamom
hu: Kardámom
ja: カルダモン
lt: Kardamonas
nl: Kardemom

en: Black cardamom
es: Cardamono negro
fr: Cardamome brune
hr: Crni kardamom
hu: Fekete kardámom
la: Amomum subulatum
lt: Juodasis kardamonas
nl: Zwarte kardemom

en: Green cardamom, True cardamom
es: Cardamono verde
fr: Cardamome verte, Cardamome aromatique
hr: Zeleni kardamom
hu: Zöld kardámom
la: Elettaria cardamomum
lt: Žaliasis kardamonas
nl: Groene kardemom